New York, session 2025-2026, S7949.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of section 390 of the social 2 services law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (iii) to read as 3 follows: 4 (iii) If the office of children and family services determines, after 5 the completion of an inspection of a child day care provider's facility 6 pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, that such day care 7 provider does not meet the necessary licensing requirements because such 8 facility requires necessary changes or accommodations, the office of 9 children and family services shall extend the ninety-day period set 10 forth in 18 NYCRR 414.2(c) to allow such day care provider to correct or 11 make any required necessary changes without having to restart the 12 licensing process from the initial application submission. After an 13 initial extension has been provided pursuant to this section, the office 14 of children and family services shall have the authority to grant addi- 15 tional extensions of time as necessary. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09831-03-5